District of Columbia statutes.
8-115.13

Repealed

Civil penalties/fines; civil infractions.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-221, § 14, 43 DCR 6854
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-347, § 2(m), 52 DCR 2627
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 21(a), 56 DCR 1596
1981 Ed., § 6-997.13.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-204, October 17, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 10460).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lead Based Paint Abatement and Control Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-28, September 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 8351).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lead Based Paint Abatement and Control Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-180, September 8, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 9222).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-397, June 25, 2002, 49 DCR 6511).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-478, October 3, 2002, 49 DCR 9574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-89, May 19, 2003, 50 DCR 4334).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lead-based Paint Abatement and Control Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-125, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6641).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lead-based Paint Abatement and Control Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-125, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6641).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-411, April 21, 2004, 51 DCR 4677).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Lead-based Paint Abatement and Control Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-468, July 19, 2004, 51 DCR 7587).

Section 5 of D.C. Law 15-347 provided: “Sec. 5. Applicability. Section 2(l) and (m) shall apply upon publication in the District of Columbia Register by the Mayor of a list of civil infraction fines and a recommended schedule of fines or penalties for the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to consider.”

For Law 17-381, see notes following § 8-115.01.